Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.762

Loan program for mathematics and science teachers—Terms and conditions—Collection—Disposition of payments—Rules.

(1) The council may make long-term loans to eligible students at institutions of higher education from the funds appropriated to the council for this purpose. The amount of any such loan shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the student or two thousand five hundred dollars for each academic year whichever is less, and the total amount of such loans to an eligible student shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. The interest rates and terms of deferral of such loans shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program established by 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq. The period for repaying the loan principal and interest shall be ten years with payments accruing quarterly commencing nine months from the date the borrower graduated. The entire principal and interest of each loan payment shall be forgiven for each payment period in which the borrower teaches science or mathematics in a public school in this state until the entire loan is satisfied or the borrower ceases to teach science or mathematics at a public school in this state. Should the borrower cease to teach science or mathematics at a public school in this state before the time in which the principal and interest on the loan are satisfied, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest on the loan shall begin the next payment period and continue until the remainder of the loan is paid.

(2) The council is responsible for collection of loans made under subsection (1) of this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are made. Collection and servicing of loans under subsection (1) of this section shall be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment if necessary, and shall be performed by entities approved for such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency. The council is responsible to forgive all or parts of such loans under the criteria established in subsection (1) of this section and shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.

(3) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other subsidies to which the council as lender is entitled, which are paid by or on behalf of borrowers under subsection (1) of this section, shall be deposited with the office and shall be used to cover the costs of making the loans under subsection (1) of this section, maintaining necessary records, and making collections under subsection (2) of this section. The office shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to make loans to eligible students.

(4) Any funds not used to make loans, or to cover the cost of making loans or making collections, shall be placed in the state educational trust fund for students who demonstrate financial need.

(5) The council shall adopt necessary rules to implement this section.

[ 2019 c 406 s 32; 2012 c 229 s 529; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 156; 1996 c 107 s 2; 1985 c 370 s 80; 1983 1st ex.s. c 74 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 74: See note following RCW 28B.15.760.